Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4822.
peoplE of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 501. (1) A department of natural resources for this state is created. which shall possess The department has the powers and shall perform the duties granted and imposed by this act and as otherwise provided by law. (2) The commission of natural resources is created as the head of the department of natural resources and may establish general policies related to natural resources management and environmental protection for the guidance of the director. In addition, the commission has appellate authority as provided in section 1101. The commission shall be is composed of 7 members, not subject to the following: (a) No more than 4 of whom shall members may be members of the same political party. , appointed by the (b) The governor by and shall appoint each member with the advice and consent of the senate. (c) A member of the commission shall must be selected with special reference to that person's individual's training and experience related to at least 1 of the principal lines of activities vested in the department of natural resources and the ability and fitness of that person individual to deal with those activities. (d) The term of office of each member of the commission shall be is 4 years. (e) The governor shall fill a vacancy occurring in the membership of the commission and may remove a member of the commission for cause after a hearing. (f) Each member of the commission shall hold office until the appointment and qualification of that member's successor. (3) The commission, within 30 days after having qualified and annually after that time, shall meet at its office in Lansing and organize by appointing a secretary, who need not be a member of the commission. The governor shall appoint a chairperson of the commission from among its members, who shall serve as chairperson at the pleasure of the governor. Four members of the commission constitute a quorum for the transaction of business. The Subject to this subsection, the business which that the commission may perform shall must be conducted at a public meeting of the commission held in compliance with the open meetings act, Act No. 267 of the Public Acts of 1976, being sections 15.261 to 15.275 of the Michigan Compiled Laws. Public 1976 PA 267, MCL 15.261 to 15.275. Subject to this subsection, public notice of the time, date, and place of the meeting shall must be given in the manner required by Act No. 267 of the Public Acts of 1976. the open meetings act, 1976 PA 267, MCL 15.261 to 15.275. A meeting may be called by the chairperson and shall must be called on request of a majority of the members of the commission. A The commission may hold a meeting may be held as often as necessary and at other places than the commissioners' offices at in Lansing. The commission shall meet at least once each month. The commission shall do all of the following: (a) Provide live video streaming of all of its public meetings. (b) Publish the link for viewing meetings not less than 24 hours before the meeting on the commission's website. (c) Make past meetings available for viewing on the commission's website. (d) Maintain a publicly available archive of all past meetings, organized and searchable by date and subject matter. (4) The commission shall appoint and employ a director who shall continue in office serves at the pleasure of the commission. The director shall appoint 1 or more deputy directors and other assistants and employees as are necessary to implement this part and any other law of this state affecting the powers and duties of the department of natural resources. A person to whom the director has lawfully delegated decision making authority in writing may perform a duty or exercise a power conferred by law upon on the department at the time and to the extent the duty and power is delegated to that person by the director. When If a vacancy in the office of director occurs, or the director is unable to perform the director's duties or is absent from the this state, the powers and duties of the director as prescribed by law shall must be imposed on and transferred to a deputy director until the vacancy is filled or the director's inability or absence from the this state ceases. (5) The compensation of the deputy directors, the assistants, and the employees and the number of assistants and employees shall be are subject to the approval of the state administrative board. The members of the commission shall not receive compensation under this part, but each member and the other officers and employees of the department of natural resources shall be are entitled to reasonable expenses while traveling in the performance of their duties prescribed by this act. The salaries and expenses authorized under this act shall must be paid out of the state treasury in the same manner as the salaries of other state officers and employees are paid. The department of technology, management, and budget shall furnish suitable offices and office equipment, at in Lansing, for the use of the department of natural resources. Each member of the commission and the director shall qualify by taking and subscribing to the constitutional oath of office prescribed in section 1 of article XI of the state constitution of 1963 and by filing it the oath in the office of the secretary of state.